test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-o_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - ilo:
    ilo+N+Sg+Nom:  iˊḷo
    ilo+N+Sg+Gen:  iˊlo
    ilo+N+Sg+Acc:  iˊlo
    ilo+N+Sg+Ill:  iˊḷon
    ilo+N+Sg+Loc:  iiloost
    ilo+N+Sg+Com: [iilooin, iiloin]
    ilo+N+Sg+Abe:  iˊlottáá
    ilo+N+Ess:  illoon
    ilo+N+Par:  illood
    ilo+N+Pl+Nom:  iˊloh
    ilo+N+Pl+Gen:  iˊloi
    ilo+N+Pl+Acc:  iˊloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Ill:  iˊloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Loc:  iˊloin
    ilo+N+Pl+Com:  iˊloiguin
    ilo+N+Pl+Abe:  iˊloittáá

  Noun - hillo:
    hillo+N+Sg+Nom:  hillo
    hillo+N+Sg+Gen:  hiˊḷo
    hillo+N+Sg+Acc:  hiˊḷo
    hillo+N+Sg+Ill:  hiiḷon
    hillo+N+Sg+Loc:  hilloost
    hillo+N+Sg+Com:  hilloin
    hillo+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊḷottáá
    hillo+N+Ess:  hillon
    hillo+N+Par:  hillod
    hillo+N+Pl+Nom:  hiˊḷoh
    hillo+N+Pl+Gen:  hiˊḷoi
    hillo+N+Pl+Acc:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Ill:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Loc:  hiˊḷoin
    hillo+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊḷoiguin
    hillo+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊḷoittáá

  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: miˊḷo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: miˊḷo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miiḷon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miˊḷottáá
    millo+N+Ess:    millon
    millo+N+Par:    millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miˊḷoh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miˊḷoi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: miḷoin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: miˊḷoiguin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miˊḷoittáá

  Noun - himo:
    himo+N+Sg+Nom:  hiˊṃo
    himo+N+Sg+Gen:  hiˊmo
    himo+N+Sg+Acc:  hiˊmo
    himo+N+Sg+Ill:  hiṃon
    himo+N+Sg+Loc:  hiimoost
    himo+N+Sg+Com: [hiimooin, himoin]
    himo+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊmottáá
    himo+N+Ess:  himmoon
    himo+N+Par:  himmood
    himo+N+Pl+Nom:  hiˊmoh
    himo+N+Pl+Gen:  hiˊmoi
    himo+N+Pl+Acc:  hiˊmoid
    himo+N+Pl+Ill:  hiˊmoid
    himo+N+Pl+Loc:  hiˊmoin
    himo+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊmoiguin
    himo+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊmoittáá

  Noun - pino:
    pino+N+Sg+Nom:  piˊṇo
    pino+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊno
    pino+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊno
    pino+N+Sg+Ill:  piˊṇon
    pino+N+Sg+Loc:  piinoost
    pino+N+Sg+Com:  piˊnoin
    pino+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊnottáá
    pino+N+Ess:  pinnoon
    pino+N+Par:  pinnood
    pino+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊnoh
    pino+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊnoi
    pino+N+Pl+Acc:  piˊnoid
    pino+N+Pl+Ill:  pinoid
    pino+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊnoin
    pino+N+Pl+Com:  piˊnoiguin
    pino+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊnoittáá

  Noun - sino:
    sino+N+Sg+Nom:  siṇo
    sino+N+Sg+Gen:  siˊno
    sino+N+Sg+Acc:  siˊno
    sino+N+Sg+Ill:  siṇon
    sino+N+Sg+Loc:  siinoost
    sino+N+Sg+Com:  sinoin
    sino+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊnottáá
    sino+N+Ess:  sinnoon
    sino+N+Par:  sinnood
    sino+N+Pl+Nom:  siˊnoh
    sino+N+Pl+Gen:  siˊnoi
    sino+N+Pl+Acc:  siˊnoid
    sino+N+Pl+Ill:  siˊnoid
    sino+N+Pl+Loc:  siˊnoin
    sino+N+Pl+Com:  siˊnoiguin
    sino+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊnoittáá

  Noun - tinno:
    tinno+N+Sg+Nom:  tinno
    tinno+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊṇo
    tinno+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊṇo
    tinno+N+Sg+Ill:  tiiṇon
    tinno+N+Sg+Loc:  tinnoost
    tinno+N+Sg+Com:  tiˊṇoin
    tinno+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊṇottáá
    tinno+N+Ess:  tinnoon
    tinno+N+Par:  tinnood
    tinno+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊṇoh
    tinno+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊṇoi
    tinno+N+Pl+Acc:  tiˊṇoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Ill:  tinnoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Loc:  tiˊṇoin
    tinno+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊṇoiguin
    tinno+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊṇoittáá

  Noun - kirno:
    kirno+N+Sg+Nom:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊrno
    kirno+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊrno
    kirno+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirnon
    kirno+N+Sg+Loc:  kirnoost
    kirno+N+Sg+Com:  kirnoin
    kirno+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊrnottáá
    kirno+N+Ess:     kirnon
    kirno+N+Par:     kirnod
    kirno+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊrnoh
    kirno+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊrnoi
    kirno+N+Pl+Acc:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Ill:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊrnoin
    kirno+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊrnoiguin
    kirno+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊrnoittáá

  Noun - lippo:
    lippo+N+Sg+Nom:  lippo
    lippo+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊpo
    lippo+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊpo
    lippo+N+Sg+Ill:  liipon
    lippo+N+Sg+Loc:  lippoost
    lippo+N+Sg+Com:  lippoin
    lippo+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊpottáá
    lippo+N+Ess:  lippon
    lippo+N+Par:  lippod
    lippo+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊpoh
    lippo+N+Pl+Gen:  liˊpoi
    lippo+N+Pl+Acc:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Ill:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊpoin
    lippo+N+Pl+Com:  liˊpoiguin
    lippo+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊpoittáá

  Noun - rippo:
    rippo+N+Sg+Nom:  rippo
    rippo+N+Sg+Gen:  riˊpo
    rippo+N+Sg+Acc:  riˊpo
    rippo+N+Sg+Ill:  riipon
    rippo+N+Sg+Loc:  rippoost
    rippo+N+Sg+Com:  rippoin
    rippo+N+Sg+Abe:  riˊpottáá
    rippo+N+Ess:  rippon
    rippo+N+Par:  rippod
    rippo+N+Pl+Nom:  riˊpoh
    rippo+N+Pl+Gen:  riˊpoi
    rippo+N+Pl+Acc:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Ill:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Loc:  riˊpoin
    rippo+N+Pl+Com:  riˊpoiguin
    rippo+N+Pl+Abe:  riˊpoittáá

  Noun - nitro:
    nitro+N+Sg+Nom:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Gen:  niˊtro
    nitro+N+Sg+Acc:  niˊtro
    nitro+N+Sg+Ill:  niitron
    nitro+N+Sg+Loc:  nitroost
    nitro+N+Sg+Com:  nitroin
    nitro+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊtrottáá
    nitro+N+Ess:  nitron
    nitro+N+Par:  nitrod
    nitro+N+Pl+Nom:  niˊtroh
    nitro+N+Pl+Gen:  niˊtroi
    nitro+N+Pl+Acc:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Ill:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Loc:  niˊtroin
    nitro+N+Pl+Com:  niˊtroiguin
    nitro+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊtroittáá

  Noun - pisso:
    pisso+N+Sg+Nom:  pisso
    pisso+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊṣo
    pisso+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊṣo
    pisso+N+Sg+Ill:  piiṣon
    pisso+N+Sg+Loc:  pissoost
    pisso+N+Sg+Com:  pissoin
    pisso+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊṣottáá
    pisso+N+Ess:  pisson
    pisso+N+Par:  pissod
    pisso+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊṣoh
    pisso+N+Pl+Gen:  piˊṣoi
    pisso+N+Pl+Acc: pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Ill:  pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊṣoin
    pisso+N+Pl+Com:  piˊṣoiguin
    pisso+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊṣoittáá

  Noun - ito:
    ito+N+Sg+Nom:  ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen:  iˊđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc:  iˊđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill:  iˊton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc:  iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com:  iiđooin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe:  iˊđottáá
    ito+N+Ess:  ittoon
    ito+N+Par:  ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom:  iˊđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen:  iˊđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc:  iˊđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill:  iiđooid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc:  iˊđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com:  iˊđoiguin
    ito+N+Pl+Abe:  iˊđoittáá

  Noun - kisto:
    kisto+N+Sg+Nom:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Gen:  kiˊsto
    kisto+N+Sg+Acc:  kiˊsto
    kisto+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiston
    kisto+N+Sg+Loc:  kistoost
    kisto+N+Sg+Com:  kistoin
    kisto+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊstottáá
    kisto+N+Ess:  kiston
    kisto+N+Par:  kistod
    kisto+N+Pl+Nom:  kiˊstoh
    kisto+N+Pl+Gen:  kiˊstoi
    kisto+N+Pl+Acc:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Ill:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Loc:  kiˊstoin
    kisto+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊstoiguin
    kisto+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊstoittáá

  Noun - listo:
    listo+N+Sg+Nom:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊsto
    listo+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊsto
    listo+N+Sg+Ill:  liiston
    listo+N+Sg+Loc:  listoost
    listo+N+Sg+Com:  listoin
    listo+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊstottáá
    listo+N+Ess:  liston
    listo+N+Par:  listod
    listo+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊstoh
    listo+N+Pl+Gen:  liˊstoi
    listo+N+Pl+Acc:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Ill:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊstoin
    listo+N+Pl+Com:  liˊstoiguin
    listo+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊstoittáá

  Noun - litto:
    litto+N+Sg+Nom:  litto
    litto+N+Sg+Gen:  liˊto
    litto+N+Sg+Acc:  liˊto
    litto+N+Sg+Ill:  liiton
    litto+N+Sg+Loc:  littoost
    litto+N+Sg+Com:  littoin
    litto+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊtottáá
    litto+N+Ess:  litton
    litto+N+Par:  littod
    litto+N+Pl+Nom:  liˊtoh
    litto+N+Pl+Gen:  liˊtoi
    litto+N+Pl+Acc:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Ill:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Loc:  liˊtoin
    litto+N+Pl+Com:  liˊtoiguin
    litto+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊtoittáá

  Noun - mitto:
    mitto+N+Sg+Nom:  mitto
    mitto+N+Sg+Gen:  miˊto
    mitto+N+Sg+Acc:  miˊto
    mitto+N+Sg+Ill:  miiton
    mitto+N+Sg+Loc:  mittoost
    mitto+N+Sg+Com:  mittoin
    mitto+N+Sg+Abe:  miˊtottáá
    mitto+N+Ess:  mitton
    mitto+N+Par:  mittod
    mitto+N+Pl+Nom:  miˊtoh
    mitto+N+Pl+Gen:  miˊtoi
    mitto+N+Pl+Acc:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Ill:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Loc:  miˊtoin
    mitto+N+Pl+Com:  miˊtoiguin
    mitto+N+Pl+Abe:  miˊtoittáá

  Noun - nijtto:
    nijtto+N+Sg+Nom:  nijtto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Gen:  niˊjto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Acc:  niˊjto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Ill:  niijton
    nijtto+N+Sg+Loc: [niijtost, nijttoost]
    nijtto+N+Sg+Com:  nijttoin
    nijtto+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊjtottáá
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijtton
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijttod
    nijtto+N+Pl+Nom:  niˊjtoh
    nijtto+N+Pl+Gen: [niijtoi, niˊjtoi]
    nijtto+N+Pl+Acc:  niijtoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Ill:  nijttoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Loc:  niijtoin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Com:  niˊjtoiguin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊjtoittáá

  Noun - sijvo:
    sijvo+N+Sg+Nom:  sijvo
    sijvo+N+Sg+Gen: [siˊjvo, siijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Acc: [siˊjvo, siijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Ill:  siijvon
    sijvo+N+Sg+Loc: [siijvost, sijvoost]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Com:  sijvoin
    sijvo+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊjvottáá
    sijvo+N+Ess:  sijvon
    sijvo+N+Par:  sijvod
    sijvo+N+Pl+Nom: [siijvoh, siˊjvoh]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Gen: [siijvoi, siˊjvoi]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Acc:  siijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Ill:  sijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Loc:  siijvoin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Com:  siˊjvoiguin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊjvoittáá

  Noun - tipšo:
    tipšo+N+Sg+Nom:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊpšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊpšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Ill:  tiipšon
    tipšo+N+Sg+Loc:  tipšoost
    tipšo+N+Sg+Com:  tipšoin
    tipšo+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊpšottáá
    tipšo+N+Ess:  tipšon
    tipšo+N+Par:  tipšod
    tipšo+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊpšoh
    tipšo+N+Pl+Gen:  tiˊpšoi
    tipšo+N+Pl+Acc:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Ill:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Loc:  tiˊpšoin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊpšoiguin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊpšoittáá

  Noun - huilo:
    huilo+N+Sg+Nom:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Gen:  huˊilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Acc:  huˊilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Ill:  huuilon
    huilo+N+Sg+Loc:  huiloost
    huilo+N+Sg+Com:  huiloin
    huilo+N+Sg+Abe:  huˊilottáá
    huilo+N+Ess:  huilon
    huilo+N+Par:  huilod
    huilo+N+Pl+Nom:  huˊiloh
    huilo+N+Pl+Gen:  huˊiloi
    huilo+N+Pl+Acc:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Ill:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Loc:  huˊiloin
    huilo+N+Pl+Com:  huˊiloiguin
    huilo+N+Pl+Abe:  huˊiloittáá

  Noun - tobdo:
    tobdo+N+Sg+Nom:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Gen:  toˊbdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Acc:  toˊbdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Ill:  toobdon
    tobdo+N+Sg+Loc:  tobdoost
    tobdo+N+Sg+Com:  tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊbdottáá
    tobdo+N+Ess:  tobdon
    tobdo+N+Par:  tobdod
    tobdo+N+Pl+Nom:  toˊbdoh
    tobdo+N+Pl+Gen:  toˊbdoi
    tobdo+N+Pl+Acc:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Ill:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Loc:  toˊbdoin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Com:  toˊbdoiguin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊbdoittáá

  Noun - oljo:
    oljo+N+Sg+Nom:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Ill:  ooljon
    oljo+N+Sg+Loc:  oljoost
    oljo+N+Sg+Com:  oljoin
    oljo+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊljottáá
    oljo+N+Ess:  oljon
    oljo+N+Par:  oljod
    oljo+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊljoh
    oljo+N+Pl+Gen:  oˊljoi
    oljo+N+Pl+Acc:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Ill:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Loc:  oˊljoin
    oljo+N+Pl+Com:  oˊljoiguin
    oljo+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊljoittáá

  Noun - okko:
    okko+N+Sg+Nom:  okko
    okko+N+Sg+Gen:  oho
    okko+N+Sg+Acc:  oho
    okko+N+Sg+Ill:  ookon
    okko+N+Sg+Loc:  ohhoost
    okko+N+Sg+Com:  ohhoin
    okko+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊhottáá
    okko+N+Ess:  okkon
    okko+N+Par:  okkod
    okko+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊhoh
    okko+N+Pl+Gen:  oˊhoi
    okko+N+Pl+Acc:  oˊhoid
    okko+N+Pl+Ill:  ohhoid
    okko+N+Pl+Loc:  oˊhoin
    okko+N+Pl+Com:  oˊhoiguin
    okko+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊhoittáá

  Noun - osko:
    osko+N+Sg+Nom:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊsko
    osko+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊsko
    osko+N+Sg+Ill:  ooskon
    osko+N+Sg+Loc:  oskoost
    osko+N+Sg+Com:  oskoin
    osko+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊskottáá
    osko+N+Ess:  oskon
    osko+N+Par:  oskod
    osko+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊskoh
    osko+N+Pl+Gen:  oˊskoi
    osko+N+Pl+Acc:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Ill:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Loc:  oˊskoin
    osko+N+Pl+Com:  oˊskoiguin
    osko+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊskoittáá
